Oklahoma, session 2025, SB768.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1272, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1272.
UNLAWFUL CARRY
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be
unlawful for any person to carry upon or about his or her person, or
in a purse or other container belonging to the person, any pistol,
revolver, shotgun, or rifle, whether loaded or unloaded, or any
blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, metal knuckles, or any other

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

offe nsive weapon, whether such weapon be concealed or unconcealed,
except this section shall not prohibit:
1. The proper use of guns and knives for self-defense, hunting,
fishing, or educational or recreational purposes;
2. The carrying or use of weapons in a manner otherwise
permitted by statute or authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act;
3. The carrying, possession, and use of any weapon by a peace
officer or other person authorized by law to carry a weapon in the
performance of official duties and in compliance with the rules of
the employing agency;
4. The carrying, possession, and use of a handgun by a first
responder who possesses a valid handgun license issued pursuant to
the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and who is acting in
the course and scope of employment and in compliance with the rules
of the employing agency on any public or private property in this
state. For a first responder to carry, possess, or use a handgun on
trust land of a federally recognized Indian tribe, a political
subdivision may enter into intergovernmental cooperative agreements
with a federally recognized Indian tribe as authorized by Section
1221 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Any intergovernmental
cooperative agreement entered into between a political subdivision
and a federally recognized Indian tribe related to first responder
services shall be agreed upon before a first responder carries,
possesses, or uses a handgun on such trust land. As provided in
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

this paragraph, “first responder” means a firefighter or licensed
emergency medical personnel as defined in Section 1-2503 of Title 63
of the Oklahoma Statutes but shall not include a voluntary first
responder;
5. The carrying or use of weapons in a courthouse by a district
judge, associate district judge, or special district judge within
this state, who is in possession of a valid handgun license issued
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and
whose name appears on a list maintained by the Administrative
Director of the Courts;
5. 6. The carrying and use of firearms and other weapons
provided in this subsection when used for the purpose of living
history reenactment. For purposes of this paragraph, “living
history reenactment” means depiction of historical characters,
scenes, historical life, or events for entertainment, education, or
historical documentation through the wearing or use of period,
historical, antique, or vintage clothing, accessories, firearms,
weapons, and other implements of the historical period; or
6. 7. The transporting by vehicle on a public roadway or the
carrying of a firearm, concealed or unconcealed, loaded or unloaded,
by a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older or by a
person who is eighteen (18) years of age but not yet twenty-one (21)
years of age and the person is a member or veteran of the United
States Armed Forces, Reserves, or National Guard or was discharged
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

unde r honorable conditions from the United States Armed Forces,
Reserves, or National Guard, and the person is otherwise not
disqualified from the possession or purchase of a firearm under
state or federal law and is not carrying the firearm in furtherance
of a crime.
Except as provided in subsection B of Section 1283 of this
title, a person who has been convicted of any one of the following
offenses in this state or a violation of the equivalent law of
another state:
a. assault and battery pursuant to the provisions of
Section 644 of this title which caused serious
physical injury to the victim,
b. aggravated assault and battery pursuant to the
provisions of Section 646 of this title,
c. assault and battery that qualifies as domestic abuse
as defined in Section 644 of this title,
d. stalking pursuant to the provisions of Section 1173 of
this title,
e. a violation of an order issued under the Protection
from Domestic Abuse Act or a domestic abuse protection
order issued by another state, or
f. a violation relating to illegal drug use or possession
under the provisions of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

shal l be prohibited from carrying a firearm under the provisions of
this paragraph subsection. Any person who carries a firearm in the
manner provided for in this paragraph subsection shall be prohibited
from carrying the firearm into any of the places prohibited in
subsection A of Section 1277 of this title or any other place
currently prohibited by law. Nothing in this section shall modify
or otherwise change where a person may legally carry a firearm.
B. Any person convicted of violating the foregoing provision
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section
1276 of this title.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1277, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1277.
UNLAWFUL CARRY IN CERTAIN PLACES
A. It shall be unlawful for any person, including a person in
possession of a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry any concealed
or unconcealed firearm into any of the following places:
1. Any structure, building, or office space which is owned or
leased by a city, town, county, state, or federal governmental
authority for the purpose of conducting business with the public;
2. Any courthouse, courtroom, prison, jail, detention facility,
or any facility used to process, hold, or house arrested persons,
prisoners, or persons alleged delinquent or adjudicated delinquent,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

exce pt as provided in Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
3. Any public or private elementary or public or private
secondary school, except as provided in subsections C and D of this
section;
4. Any publicly owned or operated sports arena or venue during
a professional sporting event, unless allowed by the event holder;
5. Any place where gambling is authorized by law, unless
allowed by the property owner;
6. Any other place specifically prohibited by law; and
7. Any property set aside by a county, city, town, public trust
with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or state governmental
authority for an event that is secured with minimum-security
provisions. For purposes of this paragraph, a minimum-security
provision consists of a location that is secured utilizing the
following:
a. a metallic-style security fence that is at least eight
(8) feet in height that encompasses the property and
is secured in such a way as to deter unauthorized
entry,
b. controlled access points staffed by a uniformed,
commissioned peace officer, and


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. a metal detector whereby persons walk or otherwise
travel with their property through or by the metal
detector.
B. It shall be lawful for a person to carry a concealed or
unconcealed firearm on the following properties:
1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any
vehicle, whether attended or unattended, by a city, town, county,
state, or federal governmental authority;
2. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any
vehicle, whether attended or unattended, which is open to the
public, or by any entity engaged in gambling authorized by law;
3. Any property adjacent to a structure, building, or office
space in which concealed or unconcealed weapons are prohibited by
the provisions of this section;
4. Any property designated by a city, town, county, or state
governmental authority as a park, recreational area, wildlife
refuge, wildlife management area, or fairgrounds; provided, nothing
in this paragraph shall be construed to authorize any entry by a
person in possession of a concealed or unconcealed firearm into any
structure, building, office space, or event which is specifically
prohibited by the provisions of subsection A of this section;
5. Any property set aside by a public or private elementary or
secondary school for the use or parking of any vehicle, whether
attended or unattended; provided, however, the firearm shall be
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

stor ed and hidden from view in a locked motor vehicle when the motor
vehicle is left unattended on school property; and
6. Any public property set aside temporarily by a county, city,
town, public trust with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or
state governmental authority for the holder of an event permit that
is without minimum-security provisions, as such term is defined in
paragraph 7 of subsection A of this section; provided, the carry of
firearms within said such permitted event area shall be limited to
concealed carry of a handgun unless otherwise authorized by the
holder of the event permit.
Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection or
subsection C of this section shall be construed to authorize or
allow any person in control of any place described in subsection A
of this section to establish any policy or rule that has the effect
of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a handgun license
or otherwise in lawful possession of a firearm from carrying or
possessing the firearm on the property described in this subsection.
C. A concealed or unconcealed weapon may be carried onto
private school property or in any school bus or vehicle used by any
private school for transportation of students or teachers by a
person who is licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act,
provided a policy has been adopted by the governing entity of the
private school that authorizes the carrying and possession of a
weapon on private school property or in any school bus or vehicle
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

used by a private school. Except for acts of gross negligence or
willful or wanton misconduct, a governing entity of a private school
that adopts a policy which authorizes the possession of a weapon on
private school property, a school bus or vehicle used by the private
school shall not be subject to liability for any injuries arising
from the adoption of the policy. The provisions of this subsection
shall not apply to claims pursuant to the Administrative Workers’
Compensation Act.
D. Notwithstanding paragraph 3 of subsection A of this section,
a 1. A board of education of a school district may adopt a policy
pursuant to Section 5-149.2 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes to
authorize the carrying of a handgun onto school property by school
personnel specifically designated by the board of education,
provided such personnel either:
1. Possess
a. possesses a valid armed security guard license as
provided for in Section 1750.1 et seq. of Title 59 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;, or
2. Hold
b. holds a valid reserve peace officer certification as
provided for in Section 3311 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
2. A first responder, as defined in subparagraph 4 of
subsection A of Section 1272 of this title, acting in the course and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

scop e of employment who possesses a valid handgun license issued
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act may
openly carry a handgun onto school property.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict authority
granted elsewhere in law to carry firearms.
E. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this
section, on any property designated as a municipal zoo or park of
any size that is owned, leased, operated, or managed by:
1. A public trust created pursuant to the provisions of Section
176 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or
2. A nonprofit entity,
an individual shall be allowed to carry a concealed handgun but not
openly carry a handgun on the property. A first responder acting in
the course and scope of employment who possesses a valid handgun
license issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act may openly carry a handgun onto such property.
F. Any person violating the provisions of paragraph 2 or 3 of
subsection A of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty
Dollars ($250.00). A person violating any other provision of
subsection A of this section may be denied entrance onto the
property or removed from the property. If the person refuses to
leave the property and a peace officer is summoned, the person may

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

be i ssued a citation for an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty
Dollars ($250.00).
G. No Except for a first responder acting in the course and
scope of employment, no person in possession of a valid handgun
license issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act or who is carrying or in possession of a firearm as
otherwise permitted by law or who is carrying or in possession of a
machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles shall
be authorized to carry the firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane,
hand chain, or metal knuckles into or upon any college, university,
or technology center school property, except as provided in this
subsection. For purposes of this subsection, the following property
shall not be construed to be college, university, or technology
center school property:
1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any motor
vehicle, whether attended or unattended, provided the firearm,
machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles are
carried or stored as required by law and the firearm, machete,
blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles are not
removed from the motor vehicle without the prior consent of the
college or university president or technology center school
administrator while the vehicle is on any college, university, or
technology center school property;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Any property authorized for possession or use of firearms,
machetes, blackjacks, loaded canes, hand chains, or metal knuckles
by college, university, or technology center school policy; and
3. Any property authorized by the written consent of the
college or university president or technology center school
administrator, provided the written consent is carried with the
firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal
knuckles and the valid handgun license while on college, university,
or technology center school property.
The college, university, or technology center school may notify
the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation within ten (10) days of a
violation of any provision of this subsection by a licensee. Upon
receipt of a written notification of violation, the Bureau shall
give a reasonable notice to the licensee and hold a hearing. At the
hearing, upon a determination that the licensee has violated any
provision of this subsection, the licensee may be subject to an
administrative fine of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) and may
have the handgun license suspended for three (3) months.
Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection shall be
construed to authorize or allow any college, university, or
technology center school to establish any policy or rule that has
the effect of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a
handgun license or any person in lawful possession of a firearm,
machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles from
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

poss ession of a firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand
chain, or metal knuckles in places described in paragraphs 1, 2, and
3 of this subsection. Nothing contained in any provision of this
subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of any college,
university, or technology center school in this state from taking
administrative action against any student for any violation of any
provision of this subsection.
H. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the
following:
1. Any peace officer or any person authorized by law to carry a
firearm in the course of employment;
2. District judges, associate district judges, and special
district judges, who are in possession of a valid handgun license
issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act
and whose names appear on a list maintained by the Administrative
Director of the Courts, when acting in the course and scope of
employment within the courthouses of this state;
3. Private investigators with a firearms authorization when
acting in the course and scope of employment;
4. Elected officials An elected official of a county, who are
is in possession of a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, may carry a concealed
handgun when acting in the performance of his or her duties within
the courthouses of the county in which he or she was elected. The
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prov isions of this paragraph shall not allow the elected county
official to carry the handgun into a courtroom;
5. The sheriff of any county may authorize certain employees of
the county, who possess a valid handgun license issued pursuant to
the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry a
concealed handgun when acting in the course and scope of employment
within the courthouse in the county in which the person is employed.
Nothing in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall prohibit the sheriff
from requiring additional instruction or training before granting
authorization to carry a concealed handgun within the courthouse.
The provisions of this paragraph and of paragraph 6 of this
subsection shall not allow the county employee to carry the handgun
into a courtroom, sheriff’s office, adult or juvenile jail or any
other prisoner detention area; and
6. The board of county commissioners of any county may
authorize certain employees of the county, who possess a valid
handgun license issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma
Self-Defense Act, to carry a concealed handgun when acting in the
course and scope of employment on county annex facilities or grounds
surrounding the county courthouse; and
7. A first responder who possesses a valid handgun license
issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act
who carries a handgun when acting in the course and scope of
employment.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

I. For the purposes of this section, “motor vehicle” means any
automobile, truck, minivan, sports utility vehicle, or motorcycle,
as defined in Section 1-135 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
equipped with a locked accessory container within or affixed to the
motorcycle.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS

















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB768 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)